Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 7981. DENTON COUNTY MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT NO. 5

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7981.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Denton County Municipal Utility District No. 5.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 800 (H.B. 2987), Sec. 1, eff. August 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 7981.051. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, applicable to municipal utility districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 800 (H.B. 2987), Sec. 1, eff. August 1, 2017.

Sec. 7981.052. AUTHORITY FOR ROAD PROJECTS. Under Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may improve, operate, or maintain any macadamized, graveled, or paved roads in existence on September 1, 2017, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads inside the district.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 800 (H.B. 2987), Sec. 1, eff. August 1, 2017.

Sec. 7981.053. ROAD STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS. (a) A road project must meet all applicable construction standards, zoning and subdivision requirements, and regulations of each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the road project is located.

(b) If a road project is not located in the corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality, the road project must meet all applicable construction standards, subdivision requirements, and regulations of each county in which the road project is located.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 800 (H.B. 2987), Sec. 1, eff. August 1, 2017.

Sec. 7981.054. ACCEPTANCE OF ROADS. (a) The district by order of the board may accept any road inside the district that has been dedicated by plat or otherwise transferred to the public.

(b) On acceptance of the road by the district, the district is considered the owner of the accepted road and shall record ownership of the road in the deed records of Denton County.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 800 (H.B. 2987), Sec. 1, eff. August 1, 2017.

Sec. 7981.055. ELECTION REQUIRED. The district may not exercise the powers authorized by Section 7981.052 unless approved by a vote of a majority of district voters voting at an election called for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 800 (H.B. 2987), Sec. 1, eff. August 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS

Sec. 7981.101. ISSUANCE OF BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS FOR ROAD PROJECTS PROHIBITED. The district may not issue bonds or other obligations payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, impact fees, revenue, contract payments, grants, or other district money, or any combination of those sources, to pay for a road project authorized by Section 7981.052.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 800 (H.B. 2987), Sec. 1, eff. August 1, 2017.